Connecticut, session 2026, SB00179.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the State Bond Commission be empowered to authorize the
issuance of bonds of the state in accordance with section 3-20 of the
general statutes, in principal amounts not exceeding in the aggregate
____ dollars, the proceeds of which shall be used by the Board of
Regents for Higher Education for the purpose of providing a grant-in-
aid to Middlesex Community College for capital improvements.